Maryland, session 2026, SB0122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
2–106.
(a) Each county shall provide the supervisor of the county with an office in the
county seat or in Baltimore City, for the supervisor of Baltimore City. The Department is
responsible for providing each supervisor with clerical staff, equipment, and other facilities
and assistance that the Department considers necessary and as provided in the State
budget.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0122*

SENATE BILL 122
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, each county and
Baltimore City shall be responsible for reimbursing the State for the costs of administering
the Department as follows:
(i) 90% of the costs of real property valuation;
(ii) 90% of the costs of business personal property valuation; and
(iii) 90% of the costs of the Office of Information Technology within
the Department, including any funding for departmental projects in the Major Information
Technology Development Project Fund established under § 3.5–309 of the State Finance
and Procurement Article.
(2) For each of fiscal years 2012 and 2013, each county and Baltimore City
shall be responsible for reimbursing the State 90% instead of 50% of the costs of
administering the Department described in paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(c) Costs under subsection (b) of this section shall be allocated among the counties
and Baltimore City as follows:
(1) costs under subsection (b)(1)(i) and (iii) of this section will be allocated
based on the number of real property accounts of a county or Baltimore City as a percentage
of the total number of real property accounts statewide as of July 1 of the preceding fiscal
year; and
(2) costs under subsection (b)(1)(ii) of this section will be allocated based on
the business personal property assessable base of a county or Baltimore City as a
percentage of the total business personal property assessable bases statewide as of July 1
of the preceding fiscal year.
(d) Each county and Baltimore City shall remit [a quarterly] payment to the
Comptroller [for 25% of the jurisdiction’s share of costs on the following dates] AS
FOLLOWS:
(1) [July 1;
(2)] 50% OF THE JURISDICTION’S SHARE OF COSTS ON October 1;
[(3)] (2) 25% OF THE JURISDICTION’S SHARE OF COSTS ON January 1;
and
[(4)] (3) 25% OF THE JURISDICTION’S SHARE OF COSTS ON April 1.
(e) The Comptroller may withhold a portion of a local income tax distribution of
a county or Baltimore City that fails to make timely payment in accordance with this
section.

SENATE BILL 122 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.